Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 3.2 Rhode Island Freedom to Fish and Marine Conservation Act

20-3.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Freedom to Fish and Marine Conservation Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 167, § 1.

20-3.2-2.
Findings.

The general assembly finds and declares:

The people of the State of Rhode Island have an ongoing interest in the sound management of commercially and noncommercially important marine fish, shellfish, and crustacean species and their associated habitats.

That marine fisheries have been important to the way of life of people in Rhode Island throughout its history;

Marine fisheries support commercial operations and recreational activities, both of which are significant contributors to the state’s economy;

The rights and interests of people to engage in commercial and recreational fishing in Rhode Island’s marine waters need to be recognized and protected;

Rhode Island has historically managed its marine fisheries for the benefit of the people of the state, as an ecological asset, and as a source of food, income, and recreation;

Protecting fish, shellfish, crustaceans, essential marine habitats, and the right to fish in Rhode Island’s marine waters must be managed together;

Various management measures, including the closure of marine waters or portions thereof to fishing, can be utilized to manage marine fish, shellfish, crustaceans, essential marine habitats, or other marine resources, but such measures must be developed in response to specific conservation or restoration needs; be based on the best, currently available scientific information; and emanate from an open management and regulatory process, incorporating full input from all affected stakeholders, conducted pursuant to the general laws of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 167, § 1.

20-3.2-3.
Freedom to fish.

The marine waters of Rhode Island, or portions thereof, shall not be closed to recreational or commercial fishing unless such closure is:

Deemed necessary in order to protect, manage, or restore marine fish, shellfish, crustaceans, and associated marine habitats or other marine resources, protect public health or safety, or address some other public purpose;

Based on the best currently available scientific information; and

Developed via public review and stakeholder input through chapter 35 of title 42 and other applicable state law, and with the advice of the marine fisheries council; except where the director deems it necessary to institute a closure via emergency rule, in which case the regulation must meet the standards set forth by chapter 35 of title 42 and have an effective period of not more than one hundred twenty (120) days.

Any marine waters of Rhode Island, or portions thereof, that are closed to recreational or commercial fishing shall be reopened if and when the original justification for such closure ceases to apply.

As part of the annual reporting requirements as specified in §

20-2.1-9(6)

, the department of environmental management, upon advice of the marine fisheries council, shall include therein an evaluation of any closures identified as significant by the council and any relevant scientific information related thereto that was collected during the year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 167, § 1.